test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h24_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    kvæði+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: kvæði
    kvæði+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: kvæði
    kvæði+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: kvæði
    kvæði+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: kvæðis
    kvæði+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: [kvæði, kvæðir]
    kvæði+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: [kvæði, kvæðir]
    kvæði+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: kvæðum
    kvæði+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: kvæða
    kvæði+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: kvæðið
    kvæði+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: kvæðið
    kvæði+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: kvæðinum
    kvæði+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: kvæðisins
    kvæði+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: kvæðini
    kvæði+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: kvæðini
    kvæði+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: kvæðunum
    kvæði+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: kvæðanna
